Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 2 Regulation of Boilers and Pressure Vessels
25-15-25.
Inspections of boilers and pressure vessels.

Boilers and pressure vessels, subject to operating certificate inspections by special, owner, or user inspectors, shall be inspected within 60 calendar days following the required reinspection date. Inspections not performed within this 60 calendar day period shall result in a civil penalty of $500.00 for each boiler or pressure vessel not inspected.

Inspection fees due on boiler and pressure vessels subject to inspection by the chief or deputy inspectors or operating certificate fees due from inspections performed by special, or owner or user, inspectors shall be paid within 60 calendar days of completion of such inspections.

Inspection fees or operating certificate fees unpaid within 60 calendar days shall bear interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month or any fraction of a month. Interest shall continue to accrue until all amounts due, including interest, are received by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may waive the collection of the penalties and interest assessed as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section when it is reasonably determined that the delays in inspection or payment were unavoidable or due to the action or inaction of the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-15.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 3; Code 1981, §

25-15-25

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-15.1 as present Code Section 25-15-25; substituted “Boilers and pressure vessels, subject to operating certificate inspections by special, owner, or user inspectors, shall be” for “Boilers and pressure vessels subject to operating certificate inspections by special, or owner or user, inspectors shall be” in subsection (a); and substituted “office” for “department” at the end of subsection (c).

25-15-26.
Requirement of valid inspection certificate for operation of a boiler or pressure vessel.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate in this state a boiler or pressure vessel, except a pressure vessel covered by owner or user inspection service as provided for in Code Section 25-15-24, without a valid inspection certificate. The operation of a boiler or pressure vessel without such inspection certificate or at a pressure exceeding that specified in such inspection certificate or in violation of this article shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 34; Code 1981, §

25-15-26

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-16 as present Code Section 25-15-26; in the first sentence of this Code section, substituted “It shall be unlawful” for “After 12 months for power boilers, 24 months for low pressure steam heating, hot water heating, and hot water supply boilers, and 36 months for pressure vessels following July 1, 1984, it shall be unlawful”, and substituted “25-15-24” for “34-11-15”; and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the second sentence.

25-15-27.
Payment of inspection fees.

The owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel required by this article to be inspected by the chief inspector or a deputy inspector shall pay directly to the chief inspector, upon completion of inspection, fees as prescribed in rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner; provided, however, that, with respect to pressure vessel certificates of inspection, such fees shall not exceed $10.00 per annum. The chief inspector shall transfer all fees so received to the general fund of the state treasury. All funds so deposited in the state treasury are authorized to be appropriated by the General Assembly to the Safety Fire Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 4; Code 1981, §

25-15-27

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-17 as present Code Section 25-15-27; in the first sentence of this Code section, substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning, and substituted “a deputy” for “his deputy” near the middle; and substituted “Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Commissioner of Labor” in the last sentence.

25-15-28.
Appeals.

Any person aggrieved by an order or an act of the Commissioner or the chief inspector under this article may, within 15 days of notice thereof, request a hearing before an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings, as provided by Code Section 50-13-41.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of an administrative law judge may file an appeal pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-19, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 17; Code 1981, §

25-15-28

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 25/HB 79.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-19 as present Code Section 25-15-28, and, in subsection (a), substituted “article” for “chapter”, and substituted “office” for “Office”.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in subsection (a).

25-15-29.
Limitations on authority of local governments to regulate boilers and pressure vessels.

No county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall have the power to make any laws, ordinances, or resolutions providing for the construction, installation, inspection, maintenance, and repair of boilers and pressure vessels within the limits of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision; and any such laws, ordinances, or resolutions shall be void and of no effect.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-29

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-20 as present Code Section 25-15-29, and deleted “heretofore made or passed” following “resolutions” near the end of this Code section.

25-15-30.
State liability not created.

Neither this article nor any provision of this article shall be construed to place any liability on the State of Georgia, the office, or the Commissioner with respect to any claim by any person, firm, or corporation relating in any way whatsoever to boilers and pressure vessels and any injury or damages arising therefrom.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 10; Code 1981, §

25-15-30

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-21 as present Code Section 25-15-30, and, in this Code section, twice substituted “article” for “chapter”, and substituted “office” for “department”.

25-15-31.
Civil penalties for violations; authority of Commissioner to bring civil action.

Except as provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 25-15-25, any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this article shall, after notice and hearing, be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commissioner of not more than $5,000.00. The imposition of a penalty for a violation of this article shall not be construed as excusing the violation or permitting it to continue. The Commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this subsection.

In addition to other powers granted to the Commissioner under this article, the Commissioner may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-15-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 729, § 1/SB 353.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.